South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 63, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-63-145. (A)(1) Upon receipt of evidence of United States' citizenship and foreign birth record for a child born in a foreign country who was a United States citizen at the time of birth and born to a parent that is a resident of this State, the state registrar shall prepare, upon request, a "Certificate of Foreign Birth." (2) The certificate, and any issued copy of the certificate, must be labeled "Certificate of Foreign Birth" and must show the actual country of birth. (3) The name of the child to be displayed on the certificate must be in concurrence with the name displayed on the evidence of United States' citizenship. (B)(1) When the name on the evidence of United States' citizenship is contrary to the name listed on the foreign birth record, the state registrar shall list the name as indicated on the evidence of United States' citizenship. (2) If reasonable doubt exists as to the identity of the child, the applicant may be required to provide additional documentary evidence such as documentation of customary usage to include, but not be limited to, school records, medical records, United States passport, or a court order that provides for a legal change of name that is in concurrence with the evidence of United States' citizenship. (3) If the child's name was changed by a court order, the applicant must submit a copy of the court order. The court order must list both the child's current and former name. Court orders may be accepted from any court of competent jurisdiction, whether foreign or domestic. Unless there is reason to believe otherwise, it may be assumed that any court order provided was issued by a court of competent jurisdiction. (C) Evidence of United States' citizenship must consist of documentation issued by the United States Department of State to include the Consular Report of Birth Abroad (FS-240), Certification of Birth Abroad (FS-545), or Certification of Report of Birth (DS-1350). (D) The state registrar shall furnish a copy of the certificate to the county registrar who shall file the certificate. SECTION 2.  Section 44-63-140(3) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (3) If the person was born in a foreign country and was a United States citizen at the time of birth, the state registrar may not prepare a "Certificate of Foreign Birth" but shall notify the adoptive parents of the procedure for obtaining a revised birth certificate Consular Report of Birth Abroad (FS-240) for their child through the United States Department of State. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----